Maryland, session 2025, HB1228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
– 1 –

Ch. 235 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) The Department of Commerce, in coordination with the Montgomery County
Planning Board, the Montgomery County Office of Agricultural Services, the University of
Maryland Extension – Montgomery County, and Visit Montgomery, shall study economic
development in and the tourist and visitor economy of the Montgomery County Agricultural
Reserve to develop:
(1) a deeper understanding of the tourist and visitor sector of impact on the
Montgomery County Agricultural Reserve due to these sectors impacts being not as well
understood as the agricultural sector impact of the reserve; and
(2) policies and recommendations to help the Montgomery County
Agricultural Reserve thrive.
(b) In conducting the study required under subsection (a) of this section, the
Department of Commerce, the Montgomery County Planning Board, the Montgomery
County Office of Agricultural Services, the University of Maryland Extension –
Montgomery County, and Visit Montgomery shall:
(1) examine how tourists and visitors view the Montgomery County
Agricultural Reserve, including why they visit, where they come from, and what attractions
they find most compelling and why;
(2) (i) identify the small businesses, recreation sites, and historic sites
that are located in the Montgomery County Agricultural Reserve; and
(ii) 1. analyze how tourism and visitors contribute to these
operations and their success;
2. assess and evaluate the barriers that may deter visitors
from coming to the Montgomery County Agricultural Reserve; and
3. develop an overall assessment of economic development
and the economic impact of tourism in the Montgomery County Agricultural Reserve; and
(3) make recommendations regarding policies and programs that can help
promote and preserve the Montgomery County Agricultural Reserve and better support the
small businesses, recreation sites, and historic sites that depend on the visitor and tourist
economy.
(c) In meeting the requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the
Department of Commerce, the Montgomery County Planning Board, the Montgomery
County Office of Agricultural Services, the University of Maryland Extension –
Montgomery County, and Visit Montgomery shall, if data is available or the action required
is necessary:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 235
(1) work with relevant local organizations to gather information on visitor
volume at the Montgomery County Agricultural Reserve and other key attractions in the
area and how those visitors interact with other parts of the regional economy;
(2) engage with visitors, including by surveying visitors, to gather
information about visitor behavior and attitudes;
(3) consider whether in–depth interviews with residents, businesses, and
other stakeholders are necessary; and
(4) review existing data models to gather information on the upstream and
downstream impacts of visitation to the region.
(b) In conducting the study required under subsection (a) of this section, the
Department of Commerce shall:
(1) (i) establish a geofence around the Montgomery County
Agricultural Reserve and other key attractions in the area; and
(ii) use geolocation technology to gather information on visitor
volume and how those visitors interact with other parts of the regional economy;
(2) engage with visitors, including by surveying visitors, to gather
information about visitor behavior and attitudes;
(3) consider whether in–depth interviews with residents, businesses, and
other stakeholders are necessary; and
(4) review existing data models to gather information on the upstream and
downstream impacts of visitation to the region.
(c) (d) The Department of Commerce:
(1) shall coordinate the preparation of, synthesize, and analyze the data
made available for the study required under subsection (a) of this section; and
(2) may consult with government agencies, academic institutions, and
stakeholders to complete the study required under this section.
(d) (1) (e) On or before June 30, 2026, the Department of Commerce shall report
the findings of the study required under subsection (a) of this section, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the members of the Montgomery County
Delegation to the General Assembly.
(2) In considering the data and its findings, the Department shall:
– 3 –

Ch. 235 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) examine how tourists and visitors view the Montgomery County
Agricultural Reserve, including why they visit, where they came from, and what attractions
they found most compelling and why;
(ii) 1. identify the small businesses, recreation sites, and historic
sites that are located in the Montgomery County Agricultural Reserve; and
2. A. analyze how tourism and visitors contribute to
these operations and their success;
B. assess and evaluate the barriers that may deter visitors
from coming to the reserve; and
C. develop an overall assessment of the economic impact of
tourism in the reserve; and
(iii) make recommendations regarding policies and programs that
can help promote and preserve the Montgomery County Agricultural Reserve and better
support the small businesses, recreation sites, and historic sites that depend on the visitor
and tourist economy.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 4 –